Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.10.925

Transfer of ownership of institution-owned vessel—Review of vessel's physical condition.

(1) Prior to transferring ownership of an institution-owned vessel, an institution of higher education shall conduct a thorough review of the physical condition of the vessel, the vessel's operating capability, and any containers and other materials that are not fixed to the vessel.

(2) If the institution of higher education determines that the vessel is in a state of advanced deterioration or poses a reasonably imminent threat to human health or safety, including a threat of environmental contamination, the institution of higher education may: (a) Not transfer the vessel until the conditions identified under this subsection have been corrected; or (b) permanently dispose of the vessel by landfill, deconstruction, or other related method.

[ 2013 c 291 s 25.]